Nevada, session 83, AB302.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 50 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.2 and 1.4 of this act.
Sec. 1.2. 1. In a criminal proceeding or proceeding relating
to abuse or neglect, the court may allow a witness who is a minor
or vulnerable person to use a facility dog for support during
testimony in accordance with the procedure provided in this
section.
2. A party seeking to use a facility dog must file a motion with
the court which includes:
(a) Information concerning the qualifications and training of
the facility dog and its handler; and
(b) A statement explaining how the presence of the facility dog
may reduce the anxiety of the witness or otherwise assist in
obtaining the testimony of the witness.
3. A motion made pursuant to subsection 2:
(a) Must be made outside the presence of the jury;
(b) May be made orally or in writing; and
(c) Must be accompanied by satisfactory proof that:
(1) The facility dog and its handler are certified by an
organization that is a member of Assistance Dogs International or
its successor organization or any other nationally or
internationally recognized organization that :
(I) Specializes in the acquisition, training and placement
of assistance dogs; and
(II) Adheres to established standards of excellence in
training assistance dogs, certifying their handlers and ensuring
their suitability for use in legal proceedings; and
(2) The facility dog is covered by adequate liability
insurance.
4. The court may grant a motion made pursuant to subsection
2 if the court finds that:
(a) The facility dog and its handler are suitably qualified;
(b) The facility dog is covered by sufficient liability insurance;
-
*AB302_R1*

– 3 –
(c) The presence of the facility dog is warranted under the
circumstances because it is reasonably likely to assist the witness
in providing testimony; and
(d) The use of the facility dog will not:
(1) Unduly prejudice the defendant;
(2) Infringe on the constitutional rights of the defendant;
or
(3) Disrupt the proceedings.
5. With the approval of the court, counsel for the parties may
question prospective jurors during voir dire to determine whether
the presence of the facility dog may cause undue sympathy for the
witness or otherwise prejudice the proceedings.
6. If the court approves the use of a facility dog, the court
must:
(a) Issue an order that states the basis for its decision on the
record;
(b) Ensure, to the greatest extent practicable, that the facility
dog remains out of the view of the jury before, during and after
testimony; and
(c) Take appropriate measures to ensure the presence of the
facility dog is as unobtrusive and non-disruptive as possible.
7. Upon request of either party, the court shall provide
cautionary instructions to the jury to mitigate any potential
prejudice resulting from the presence of the facility dog. The
instructions may be given before the testimony of the witness, at
the conclusion of the trial, or both.
8. A suitably qualified handler must be present in the
courtroom or other location approved by the court for the use of a
facility dog.
9. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the
court from removing or excluding a facility dog from the
courtroom or other location approved for its use if necessary to
maintain order or to ensure the fair presentation of evidence.
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Criminal proceeding” means:
(1) A trial or hearing before a court in a prosecution of a
person charged with a violent or sexual offense; or
(2) A delinquency proceeding which is conducted pursuant
to title 5 of NRS in which a child is alleged to have committed an
unlawful act which would have been a violent or sexual offense if
committed by an adult.
(b) “Facility dog” means a dog that meets the qualifications
described in paragraph (c) of subsection 3.
-
*AB302_R1*

– 4 –
(c) “Proceeding relating to abuse or neglect” means a
proceeding held pursuant to NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590,
inclusive.
(d) “Violent or sexual offense” means the commission of an
act described in NRS 202.876.
(e) “Vulnerable person” means a person whose ability to
testify in a legal proceeding would be significantly affected
without the support of a facility dog for various reasons,
including, without limitation, the age of the person or the fact that
the person has one or more physical or mental limitations that
restrict the ability of the person to testify in a legal proceeding.
Sec. 1.4. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
upon the issuance of an order made pursuant to subsection 6 of
section 1.2 of this act, a facility dog must be permitted to enter:
(a) A courthouse or similar facility for the purpose of assisting
a witness who is a minor or vulnerable person during a legal
proceeding; and
(b) Any other building or structure owned or leased by the
county or municipality that is deemed appropriate by the court for
the purpose of preparing the witness for the legal proceeding,
including, without limitation, the office of the district attorney or
public defender in the county in which the court is located.
2. A county or municipality may, in its sole discretion,
exclude a facility dog and its handler from a building or structure
owned or leased by the county or municipality if, after entry, the
conduct of the facility dog or its handler while in the building or
structure warrants such exclusion.
3. A county or municipality that owns or leases a building or
structure is immune from liability in any action to recover
damages for any injury or loss caused, in whole or in part, by the
presence or conduct of a facility dog while on property owned or
leased by the county or municipality, including, without limitation,
actions for personal injury, wrongful death or property damage.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or
otherwise affect any immunity from or defense to civil liability to
which a county or municipality is otherwise entitled under specific
statute or common law.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
H
-
*AB302_R1*